Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1317.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; attorney general; coordinated reentry planning services program; grants; exemption A. The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the consumer restitution subaccount of the consumer restitution and remediation revolving fund established by section 44-1531.02, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the attorney general to distribute grants to counties pursuant to title 41, chapter 24, Arizona Revised Statutes, to establish or continue a coordinated reentry planning services program pursuant to section 11-392, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The attorney general shall use the monies appropriated in subsection A of this section to: 1. Award grants on a two-year cycle. 2. Allocate not more than $2,000,000 to any individual grant recipient over the two-year cycle. 3. Make not more than $2,000,000 over the two-year grant cycle available for a statewide database to accommodate additional counties participating in a coordinated reentry planning services program pursuant to section 11-392, Arizona Revised Statutes. C. At the end of the two-year grant cycle, any grantee awarded grant monies pursuant to subsection B of this section shall demonstrate all of the following: 1. Establishment of a formal coalition with a workgroup dedicated to establishing the coordinated reentry planning services program's policies and procedures. 2. Dedicated program staff that are available inside the jail. 3. Installation of a statewide cross-system recidivism tracking database. 4. Establishment of data sharing agreements. 5. Incorporation of screening and assessment tools. 6. Commitment to local contribution to the program. D. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.